Georgia, session 2025_26, HB32.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The clerk of the Probate Court of Cook County is hereby authorized to charge and collect
a technology fee to be set by the judge of the probate court in an amount not to exceed $5.00
for the filing of each civil action with the court. Such technology fees shall be used
exclusively to provide for technological needs of the Probate Court of Cook County. Such
uses shall include only the following:
(1) Computer hardware and software purchases;
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware; and
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of imaging, scanning, facsimile,
communications, projection, and printing equipment and software.
H. B. 32
- 1 -

LC 47 3116/AP
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the clerk of the probate court, subject to audit by an auditor approved by the governing
authority of Cook County, and shall be used only for the purposes authorized in this section.
(c) The authority to assess the technology fee pursuant to this Act shall terminate on
July 1, 2030, and any residual funds remaining in the account established by subsection (b)
of this section shall remain dedicated to general Cook County technology uses; provided,
however, that, if the Probate Court of Cook County determines there to be a surplus of such
funds, the judge of said court may declare a surplus once a year and transfer such surplus to
the governing authority of Cook County.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 32
- 2 -